Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1513
Higher federal standard of protection; when applicable.

In any case when federal law applicable to a child custody proceeding provides a higher standard of protection to the rights of the parent or Indian custodian of an Indian child than the rights provided under the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, the state court shall apply the federal standard.

Laws 1985, LB 255, § 13.

The lower standard of proof under subsection (3) of section 43-279.01 for the termination of parental rights to non-Indian children, as opposed to the higher standard of proof under the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act does not violate the equal protection rights of parents of non-Indian children. In re Interest of Phoenix L. et al., 270 Neb. 870, 708 N.W.2d 786 (2006).